Louisiana, session 2026, HB870.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1060.9 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1060.9. Formulary placement; coverage requirements for certain generic drugs and
biosimilars
A. For purposes of this Section, the following terms have the meanings
ascribed to them in this Subsection:
(1) "Biosimilar" means any biological product that is licensed under 42
U.S.C. 262(k) and has been listed in the United States Food and Drug
Administration's (FDA) Database of Licensed Biological Products ("Purple Book")
as biosimilar to or interchangeable with a reference biological product.
(2) "Brand drug" means a drug for which an application has been approved
under 21 U.S.C. 355(c), or a biological product, other than a biosimilar, that is
licensed under 42 U.S.C. 262(a).
(3) "Formulary" means a list of prescription drugs that is developed by a
Pharmacy and Therapeutics (P&T) Committee or other clinical and pharmacy
experts and represents a health plan's prescription drugs approved for use.
(4) "Generic drug" means a drug for which an application has been approved
under 21 U.S.C. 355(j) and which has been listed in the United States Food and Drug
Administration's Approved Drug Products with Therapeutic Equivalence Evaluations
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 870 ENROLLED
("Orange Book") as therapeutically equivalent to a reference drug, even if the
manufacturer of such drug applies a trade name to the drug.
(5) "Net cost calculation" means the wholesale acquisition cost minus all
rebates, discounts, and fees.
(6) "Reference listed drug" is the listed drug identified by the United States
Food and Drug Administration as the drug product upon which an applicant relies
in seeking approval of its application submitted under 21 U.S.C. 355(j).
(7) "Reference product" is a single biological product, licensed by the United
States Food and Drug Administration under 42 U.S.C. 262(a), against which a
proposed biosimilar or interchangeable product is compared, and listed as a reference
product in the United States Food and Drug Administration's Database of Licensed
Biological Products ("Purple Book").
(8) "Wholesale acquisition cost" has the same definition as "wholesale
acquisition cost" in 42 U.S.C. 1395w-3a(c)(6)(B).
B. If a generic drug is approved and marketed pursuant to Paragraph (A)(1)
of this Section, and has a wholesale acquisition cost that is lower than the wholesale
acquisition cost of its reference listed drug and any other drug sharing its reference
listed drug on the generic drug's initial date of marketing, a health insurance issuer
that provides coverage for the reference listed drug on that date shall do all of the
following:
(1)(a) Immediately make the generic drug available on the plan formulary
on a tier with more favorable cost-sharing, including actual out-of-pocket costs, than
the cost-sharing applicable to the reference listed drug.
(b) Not impose any prior authorization, step therapy, or any other limitation
on coverage of a generic drug for which formulary placement is required in
accordance with this Paragraph that makes it more difficult for an enrollee to obtain
coverage of or access to the generic drug than the reference listed drug.
(c) Not impose any restriction on the pharmacy through which an enrollee
may obtain the generic drug that makes it more difficult for an enrollee to obtain
coverage of or access to the generic drug than the reference listed drug.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 870 ENROLLED
(2) The requirements of this Subsection shall remain in effect if the
wholesale acquisition cost of the generic drug remains lower than the wholesale
acquisition cost of the reference listed drug.
C. If a biosimilar is licensed and marketed pursuant to Paragraph (A)(3) of
this Section and has a wholesale acquisition cost that is lower than the wholesale
acquisition cost of its reference product and any other biosimilar sharing its reference
product on the biosimilar's initial date of marketing, a health insurance issuer that
provides coverage for the reference product on that date shall do all of the following:
(1)(a) Immediately make at least one biosimilar available on the plan
formulary on a tier with more favorable cost-sharing, including actual out-of-pocket
costs, than the cost-sharing applicable to the reference product.
(b) Not impose any prior authorization, step therapy, or any other limitation
on coverage of the biosimilar drug for which formulary placement is required in
accordance with this Paragraph that makes it more difficult for an enrollee to obtain
coverage of or access to the biosimilar drug than the reference listed drug.
(c) Not impose any restriction on the pharmacy through which an enrollee
may obtain the biosimilar that makes it more difficult for an enrollee to obtain
coverage of or access to the biosimilar than to the reference product.
(2) The requirements of this Subsection shall remain in effect if the
wholesale acquisition cost of the biosimilar remains lower than the wholesale
acquisition cost of the reference product.
D.(1) A health insurance issuer may utilize net cost calculation in lieu of
wholesale acquisition cost for purposes of determining placement on the drug
formulary pursuant to this Section.
(2) A health insurance issuer shall notify the commissioner in writing within
thirty days if the health insurance issuer if the health insurance issuer opts to utilize
the net cost calculation for a branded prescription drug in a drug formulary.
(3) For each National Drug Code (NDC), the notification shall provide the
following information for both the branded prescription drug and any available
generic or biosimilar:
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 870 ENROLLED
(a) Wholesale acquisition cost.
(b) Net cost.
(4) The health insurance issuer shall provide the branded prescription drug
cost-sharing amount and the cost-sharing amount if the generic or biosimilar was
added to the drug formulary at a more favorable coverage tier.
(5) The health insurance issuer shall include in the notification how the
issuer is utilizing the rebate provided by the manufacturer of the branded prescription
drug.
E.(1) To ensure transparency regarding formulary decisions, the
commissioner shall provide an annual report, providing a summary of the
notifications pursuant to this Section, including an analysis of the overall impact on
patient costs.
(2) All information and data obtained by the department pursuant to this
Subpart that is not otherwise publicly available is considered to be a trade secret,
confidential, and proprietary, is not subject to disclosure pursuant to the Public
Records Law, R.S. 44:1 et seq., and shall not be disclosed directly or indirectly.
(3) The Department of Insurance shall impose the confidentiality protections
of this Section on any third party that may receive or otherwise have access to this
information.
Section 2. R.S. 44:4.1(B)(11) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4.1. Exceptions
* * *
B. The legislature further recognizes that there exist exceptions, exemptions,
and limitations to the laws pertaining to public records throughout the revised
statutes and codes of this state. Therefore, the following exceptions, exemptions, and
limitations are hereby continued in effect by incorporation into this Chapter by
citation:
* * *
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 870 ENROLLED
(11) R.S. 22:2, 14, 31, 42.1, 88, 244, 263, 265, 461, 550.7, 550.22, 550.29, 550.30,
571, 572, 572.1, 572.2, 574, 601.3, 618, 639, 691.4, 691.5, 691.6, 691.7, 691.8, 691.9,
691.9.1, 691.10, 691.38, 691.56, 732, 752, 753, 771, 834, 972(D), 976, 1008, 1019.2, 1060.9,
1203, 1276, 1460, 1464, 1466, 1483.1, 1488, 1546, 1559, 1566(D), 1644, 1656, 1657.1,
1660.7, 1723, 1796, 1801, 1808.3, 1869, 1927, 1929, 1983, 1984, 2036, 2045, 2056, 2085,
2091, 2293, 2303, 2508
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.